Utah statutes.
54-1-4.   Official seal.

The commission shall adopt and use an official seal with the words "Public Service Commission of Utah" and such other designations as the commission may prescribe engraved thereon; by which seal it shall authenticate its acts, orders, and proceedings; and of which seal the courts of this state shall take judicial notice. An impression of such seal shall be filed with the Division of Archives.



Amended by Chapter 67, 1984 General Session

